New York, session 2025-2026, A1809.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 837-y 2 to read as follows: 3 § 837-y. Law enforcement agencies; storage of evidence. 1. For 4 purposes of this section, "law enforcement agency" means a police agency 5 or department of the state or any political subdivision thereof, includ- 6 ing authorities or agencies maintaining police forces of individuals 7 defined as police officers in section 1.20 of the criminal procedure 8 law, or a sheriff's department. 9 2. Every law enforcement agency shall be required to keep all physical 10 or other evidence it maintains within a fireproof container or within a 11 fireproof storage area. Such container or storage area shall be located 12 within a state-of-the-art facility utilizing modern and advanced tech- 13 nology. 14 3. Prior to the storage of evidence within a fireproof container or 15 storage area as required pursuant to subdivision two of this section, 16 every law enforcement agency shall be required to photograph and docu- 17 ment such evidence and to store such photographs and documentation in a 18 separate location which is different from the location in which the 19 evidence is being stored in a fireproof container or storage area. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04672-01-5